North Dakota statutes. TITLE 39 Motor Vehicles
CHAPTER 39-10 General Rules of the Road
39-10-50.1.
Electric vehicle parking stalls or spaces — Unauthorized parking or obstructing.

If a public or private entity designates a parking space for charging an electric vehicle, the reserved space must be indicated by a sign approved by the director. The sign must be consistent with the manual of uniform traffic control devices authorized under section 39-13-06, and indicate:

Use of the reserved space is for charging electric vehicles only; and

Unauthorized use of the spaces is a nonmoving violation for which a fee of fifty dollars must be imposed.

An individual may not park or leave standing a vehicle in a stall or space designated for charging and parking a vehicle, unless the individual’s vehicle is connected for electric charging purposes.

An individual may not obstruct, block, or otherwise bar access to a space designated for charging a vehicle.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 327, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

39-10-51.
Unattended motor vehicle. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 52; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1051; repealed by 2019, ch. 318, § 2, effective August 1, 2019.

39-10-51.1.
Parking violations — Lessor responsibility.

The registered owner of a motor vehicle stopped, stood, or parked in violation of this chapter or section 39-01-15 or an equivalent ordinance is not responsible for the violation if the owner furnishes an affidavit indicating that the vehicle was at the time of the violation in the care, custody, or control of another person pursuant to a lease or rental agreement. The affidavit must contain the name, address, and operator’s license number of the person to whom the vehicle was leased or rented at the time of the violation and must be submitted to the appropriate clerk of court within thirty days of notification to the owner of the violation. The owner is responsible for the violation and the payment of any fees or fines if the affidavit is not submitted within the thirty-day period.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 425, § 1.

39-10-52.
Limitations on backing.

The driver of a vehicle may not back the same unless such movement can be made with safety and without interfering with other traffic.

The driver of a vehicle may not back the same upon any shoulder or roadway of any controlled-access highway.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 53; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1052; S.L. 1975, ch. 349, § 34.

39-10-52.1.
Driving upon sidewalk.

No person may drive any vehicle upon a sidewalk or sidewalk area except upon a permanent or duly authorized temporary driveway.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 348, § 7.

39-10-52.2.
Riding in housetrailer.

No person may be on or inside a housetrailer while it is being moved upon a public highway. Such prohibition does not apply to fifth-wheel vehicles, which are defined as mobile homes, mounted on single or tandem axles, coupled by a fifth-wheel hitch to and pivoting on a mount located immediately above or in front of the rear axle of a motor vehicle other than a passenger car.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 348, § 8.

39-10-53.
Riding on motorcycles. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 348, § 17.

Note.

For present provisions, see ch. 39-10.2.

39-10-54.
Obstruction to driver’s view or driving mechanism.

No person may drive a vehicle when it is so loaded, or when there are in the front seat such a number of persons, exceeding three, as to obstruct the view of the driver to the front or sides of the vehicle or as to interfere with the driver’s control over the driving mechanism of the vehicle.

No passenger in a vehicle may ride in such position as to interfere with the driver’s view ahead or to the sides, or to interfere with the driver’s control over the driving mechanism of the vehicle.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 55; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1054.

39-10-54.1.
Opening and closing vehicle door.

No person may open the door of a motor vehicle on the side available to moving traffic unless and until it is reasonably safe to do so and can be done without interfering with the movement of other traffic, nor may any person leave a door open on the side of a vehicle available to moving traffic for a period of time longer than necessary to load or unload passengers.

Source:

S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 17; 1975, ch. 349, § 35.

39-10-55.
Driving on mountain highways.

The driver of a motor vehicle traveling through defiles or canyons or on mountain highways shall hold such motor vehicle under control and as near the right-hand edge of the highway as reasonably possible and, except when driving entirely to the right of the center of the roadway, shall give audible warning with the horn of such motor vehicle upon approaching any curve where the view is obstructed within a distance of two hundred feet [60.96 meters] along the highway.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 56; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1055; S.L. 1975, ch. 349, § 36.

Collateral References.

Duty and liability with respect to giving audible signal where driver’s view ahead obstructed at curve or hill, 16 A.L.R.3d 897.

39-10-56.
Coasting prohibited.

The driver of any motor vehicle when traveling upon a downgrade may not coast with the gears or transmission of such vehicle in neutral.

The driver of a truck or bus when traveling upon a downgrade may not coast with the clutch disengaged.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 57; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1056; S.L. 1975, ch. 349, § 37.

39-10-57.
Following emergency vehicle too closely prohibited — Stopping by emergency vehicle.

The driver of a vehicle other than one on official business may not follow closer than five hundred feet [152.4 meters] behind an emergency vehicle displaying the appropriate light for that vehicle in an emergency. A driver of a vehicle other than one on official business may not stop the vehicle within two hundred feet [60.96 meters] of any emergency vehicle stopped in answer to a 911 emergency.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 58; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1057; S.L. 1975, ch. 347, § 38; 2003, ch. 329, § 1.

39-10-58.
Crossing firehose.

No vehicle may be driven over any unprotected hose of a fire department when laid down on any street, private road, or driveway to be used at any fire or alarm of fire without the consent of the fire department official in command.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 59; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1058; S.L. 1975, ch. 349, § 39.

39-10-59.
Garbage, glass, rubbish, and injurious materials on highway prohibited.

An individual may not deposit upon any highway any glass bottle, glass, nails, tacks, wire, cans, rubbish, or any other litter. In addition, an individual may not deposit upon a highway any other substance likely to injure a person, animal, or vehicle.

An individual who deposits, or permits to be deposited, upon a highway a destructive or injurious material shall immediately remove or cause to be removed the material.

An individual removing a wrecked or damaged vehicle from a highway shall remove any glass or other injurious substance dropped upon the highway from the vehicle.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 60, R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1059; 1991 ch. 277, § 20; 2007, ch. 332, § 1; 2011, ch. 192, § 4.

39-10-60.
Riding on bicycles. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 348, § 17.

Note.

For present provisions, see ch. 39-10.1.

39-10-61.
Clinging to vehicles. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 348, § 17.

39-10-62.
Riding on roadways and bicycle paths. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 348, § 17.

39-10-63.
Carrying articles. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 348, § 17.

39-10-63.1.
Lamps and other equipment on bicycles. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 348, § 17.

39-10-64.
Driving through safety zone prohibited.

No vehicle shall at any time be driven through or within a safety zone.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 237, § 65; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1064; S.L. 1975, ch. 347, § 24.

39-10-65.
Operation of motor vehicle, tractor, or other vehicle prohibited on flood protective works — Exception — Penalty.

Unless authorized by the authority in charge thereof, no person shall operate a motor vehicle, tractor, or other vehicle upon or across any flood protective works, including any dike or flood protective works constructed by a state or federal agency, or by any municipality or local subdivision of the state.

Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be liable to any person suffering injury as a result of the violation; and in addition, shall be guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1957, ch. 265, §§ 1, 2; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-1065; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 439.

39-10-66.
Vehicle approaching a yield right of way sign.

Repealed by S.L. 1963, ch. 283, § 20.

39-10-67.
Moving heavy equipment at railroad grade crossing.

No person may operate or move any crawler-type tractor, steam shovel, derrick, roller, or any equipment or structure having a normal operating speed of ten or less miles [16.09 or less kilometers] per hour or a vertical body or load clearance of less than one-half inch per foot [12.7 millimeters] of the distance between any two adjacent axles or in any event of less than nine inches [22.86 centimeters], measured above the level surface of a roadway, upon or across any tracks at a railroad grade crossing without first complying with this section.

Before making any such crossing, the person operating or moving any such vehicle or equipment shall first stop the same not less than fifteen feet [4.57 meters] nor more than fifty feet [15.24 meters] from the nearest rail of such railroad and while so stopped shall listen and look in both directions along such track for any approaching train and for signals indicating the approach of a train, and may not proceed until the crossing can be made safely.

No such crossing may be made when warning is given by automatic signal or crossing gates or a flagman or otherwise of the immediate approach of a railroad train or car. If a flagman is provided by the railroad, movement over the crossing must be under the flagman’s direction.

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 345, § 1.

39-10-68.
Stop when traffic obstructed.

No driver may enter any intersection or a marked crosswalk or drive onto a railroad grade crossing unless there is sufficient space on the other side of the intersection, crosswalk, or railroad grade crossing to accommodate the vehicle the driver is operating without obstructing the passage of other vehicles, pedestrians, or railroad trains notwithstanding any traffic-control signal indication to proceed.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 348, § 9.

39-10-69.
Charging violation and proving negligence in civil action.

In every charge of violation of any speed regulation, the complaint and the summons or notice to appear must specify the speed at which the defendant is alleged to have driven and also the maximum speed applicable within the district or at the location.

The provision in this title declaring maximum speed limitations may not be construed to relieve the plaintiff in any action from the burden of proving negligence on the part of the defendant as the proximate cause of the accident.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 348, § 10; 1987, ch. 73, § 21.

39-10-70.
Racing on highways. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1981, ch. 392, § 6.

39-10-71.
Fleeing or attempting to elude a peace officer — Penalty.

A driver of a motor vehicle who willfully fails or refuses to bring the vehicle to a stop, or who otherwise flees or attempts to elude, in any manner, a pursuing police vehicle or peace officer, when given a visual or audible signal to bring the vehicle to a stop, is guilty of a:

Class A misdemeanor for a first offense and a class C felony for a subsequent offense within three years;

Class C felony if the driver violates this section while willfully fleeing during or after the commission of a felony; or

Class C felony if, at any time during the flight or pursuit, the driver willfully operates the vehicle in a manner constituting an inherent risk of death or serious bodily injury to a third person.

A signal complies with this section if the signal is perceptible to the driver and:

If given from a vehicle, the signal is given by hand, voice, emergency light, or siren, and the stopping vehicle is appropriately marked showing it to be an official police vehicle; or

If not given from a vehicle, the signal is given by hand, voice, emergency light, or siren, and the officer is in uniform or prominently displays the officer’s badge of office.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 348, § 12; 1985, ch. 438, § 1; 1987, ch. 475, § 1; 1993, ch. 386, § 3; 1999, ch. 126, § 2; 2003, ch. 330, § 1; 2011, ch. 281, § 2; 2019, ch. 328, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

Cross-References.

Classification of offenses, penalties, see § 12.1-32-01.

39-10-72.
Funeral processions — Traffic regulations.

Notwithstanding any traffic-control device, a law enforcement officer leading a funeral procession may proceed through any intersection or make any turns or other movements necessary while leading the procession. The officer, without regard to any traffic-control device, may direct other drivers not in the funeral procession to stop, turn, proceed, or make other movements. When leading the funeral procession, the officer must be in a marked patrol vehicle and the vehicle’s lighted headlamps, taillamps, and top-mounted and grill-mounted signal lamps must be displayed at all times during the procession.

Notwithstanding any traffic-control device or provision governing the right of way, whenever a law enforcement officer leading a funeral procession enters an intersection, the remainder of the vehicles in the funeral procession may follow through the intersection. Each vehicle in the procession, however, must exercise reasonable care toward any other vehicle or pedestrian on the roadway.

Notwithstanding any traffic-control device or provision governing rights of way and subject to the following conditions, vehicles in a funeral procession have the right of way.

All vehicles in a funeral procession must display lighted headlamps, taillamps, and flashing emergency lamps.

All vehicles in a funeral procession must follow the preceding vehicle in the procession as closely as is safe and practicable.

The driver of a vehicle in a funeral procession shall yield the right of way to an approaching emergency vehicle when directed to do so by a law enforcement officer or when the vehicle is giving an audible or visual signal.

A vehicle that becomes separated from the funeral procession and the law enforcement escort, so that the procession is no longer continuous, must proceed to its destination in a safe and prudent manner obeying all traffic signals and general rules of the road.

Other vehicles shall conform to the following rules:

The driver of a vehicle may not drive between the vehicles comprising a funeral procession while those vehicles are in motion, except when authorized to do so by a law enforcement officer or when such vehicle is an emergency vehicle giving an audible or visible signal.

The driver of a vehicle not part of a funeral procession may not join a funeral procession for the purpose of securing the right of way granted under subsection 3.

The driver of a vehicle not in a funeral procession may not pass vehicles in such a procession on a two-lane highway or roadway.

The driver of a vehicle may pass a funeral procession on its left side on any multiple-lane highway whenever such passing can be done safely, unless the procession is in the farthest left lane, in which case passing is permissible on the right.

When a funeral procession is proceeding through a red signal as permitted by subsection 3, a vehicle that is not in the procession may not enter the intersection unless it can do so without crossing the path of the funeral procession. If the red signal changes to green while the funeral procession is still within the intersection, a vehicle facing a green signal may proceed, but the funeral procession has the right of way.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 417, § 2.

39-10-73.
Flashing green lights.

An authorized emergency vehicle may not display a flashing green light unless the vehicle is used as a command center in an emergency.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 333, § 1.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 130, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

39-10-74.
Motor vehicle platoons.

The department, in coordination with the state highway patrol superintendent, shall develop an operational plan that provides guidelines for operating a platoon. The plan must include operational information that must be provided by a platoon technology provider or commercial motor vehicle operator. The department may restrict platooning operations in accordance with the guidelines or the operational information provided in the plan.

A platoon may not operate unless the platoon technology provider or the commercial motor vehicle operator files an operational plan with the department and the plan is approved for general platoon operations. If the department does not approve the plan, the department shall inform the platoon technology provider or commercial motor vehicle operator of the reason for the disapproval and provide guidance on how to resubmit the plan to obtain approval.

A person operating a motor vehicle in a platoon without an approved plan must be assessed a fee of one hundred dollars.

A person operating a motor vehicle in violation of the guidelines in an operational plan must be assessed a fee of one hundred dollars.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 329, § 2, effective August 1, 2019.